Hawaii statutes.
§707-733 Sexual assault in the fourth
degree. (1) A person commits the offense of sexual assault in the fourth
degree if:

(a) The person knowingly subjects another person,
not married to the actor, to sexual contact by compulsion or causes another person,
not married to the actor, to have sexual contact with the actor by compulsion;

(b) The person knowingly exposes the person's
genitals to another person under circumstances in which the actor's conduct is
likely to alarm the other person or put the other person in fear of bodily
injury;

(c) The person knowingly trespasses on property for
the purpose of subjecting another person to surreptitious surveillance for the
sexual gratification of the actor; or

(d) The person knowingly engages in or causes sexual
contact with a minor who is at least sixteen years old and the person is
contemporaneously acting in a professional capacity to instruct, advise, or
supervise the minor; provided that:

(i) The person is not less than five years
older than the minor; and

(ii) The person is not legally married to the
minor.

(2) Sexual assault in the fourth degree is a
misdemeanor.

(3) Whenever a court sentences a defendant for
an offense under this section, the court may order the defendant to submit to a
pre-sentence mental and medical examination pursuant to section 706-603. [L
1986, c 314, pt of §57; am L 1991, c 214, §1; am L 2016, c 153, §2 and c 231,
§34]

COMMENTARY ON §§707-730 TO 707-734

Act 153, Session Laws 2016, amended §707-731 to include
within the offense of sexual assault in the second degree a person who
knowingly subjects to sexual penetration a minor at least sixteen years of age
if the person is contemporaneously acting in a professional capacity to
instruct, advise, or supervise the minor, with certain exceptions. The
legislature found that sexual relations between a person who is younger than
sixteen years, the age of consent, and a person who is not less than five years
older was a crime even if the younger person consents. However, once a minor
attains sixteen years of age, consensual sexual activity was not a crime and
the minor was not protected from adults who abuse the power of their position
to obtain consent. House Standing Committee Report No. 280-16, Senate Standing
Committee Report No. 3309.

Act 153, Session Laws 2016, amended §707-733 to include
within the offense of sexual assault in the fourth degree a person who
knowingly engages in or causes sexual contact with a minor who is at least
sixteen years old but less than eighteen years old if the person is
contemporaneously acting in a professional capacity to instruct, advise, or
supervise the minor, with certain exceptions. The legislature found that
sexual relations between a person who is younger than sixteen years, the age of
consent, and a person who is not less than five years older was a crime even if
the younger person consents. However, once a minor attains sixteen years of
age, consensual sexual activity was not a crime and the minor was not protected
from adults who abuse the power of their position to obtain consent. House
Standing Committee Report No. 280-16, Senate Standing Committee Report No.
3309.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended §707-733(1) to implement
recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened pursuant to
House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Case Notes

Defendant's right to a fair trial was violated where
counselor of victim-witness was allowed to place hands upon victim's shoulders
while victim was testifying. 70 H. 472, 777 P.2d 240 (1989).

Sexual assault in the fourth degree and attempted sexual
assault in the fourth degree are included offenses of attempted sexual assault
in the second degree, within the meaning of §701-109(4)(c). 79 H. 46, 897 P.2d
973 (1995).

Evidence sufficient to establish absence of consent and thus
sufficient to establish element of "compulsion". 81 H. 39, 912 P.2d
71 (1996).

Sexual assault in the fourth degree under subsection (1)(a)
not an included offense of sexual assault in the third degree under
§707-732(1)(b) as defined by §701-109(4). 83 H. 308, 926 P.2d 599 (1996).

Based on §701-109(4)(a), fourth degree sexual assault under
subsection (1)(a) is a lesser included offense of third degree sexual assault
under §707-732(1)(e). 85 H. 92 (App.), 937 P.2d 933 (1997).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next